Hawaii statutes.
§440-30 Control and supervision of amateur
boxing contest. Amateur boxing contests may be placed by the boxing
commissioner under the control and supervision of any recognized national
amateur athletic association whose standing has first been approved by the
commission, subject, however, to the rules as may be prescribed by the
commission. [L 1929, c 216, §33; RL 1935, §7020; RL 1945, §7581; RL 1955,
§165-32; HRS §440-30; am L 1983, c 241, §23]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next